North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52.6 Defined Contribution Retirement Plan
54-52.6-14.
Disability benefits.

The board shall allow distribution of the participating member’s vested account balance if the board determines that the participating member has become totally and permanently disabled. If approved, the disabled member has the same distribution options as provided in subdivisions a and c of subsection 3 of section 54-52.6-13. However, if the member chooses the periodic distribution option, the member may only receive distributions for as long as the disability continues and the member submits the necessary documentation and undergoes medical testing required by the board, or for as long as the member participates in a rehabilitation program required by the board, or both. If the board determines that a member no longer meets the eligibility definition, the board shall discontinue the disability retirement benefit.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5; 2001, ch. 498, § 5.

54-52.6-15.
Board to provide information.

The board shall provide information to employees who are eligible to elect to become participating members under this chapter. The information must include at a minimum the employee’s current account balance, the assumption of investment risk under a defined contribution retirement plan, administrative and investment costs, coordination of benefits information, and a comparison of projected retirement benefits under the public employees retirement system under chapter 54-52 and the retirement plan established under this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board is not liable for any election or investment decision made by an employee based upon information provided to an employee under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-16.
State income tax deductions.

For the purposes of state income tax, the assessment imposed by this chapter on the employee must be treated in accordance with existing state statutes on state income tax.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-17.
Exemption from state premium tax.

Premiums, consideration for annuities, and membership fees are exempt from premium taxes payable pursuant to section 26.1-03-17.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-18.
Savings clause.

If the board determines that any section of this chapter does not comply with applicable federal statutes or rules, the board shall adopt appropriate terminology with respect to that section as will comply with those federal statutes or rules. Any plan modifications made by the board pursuant to this section are effective until the effective date of any measure enacted by the legislative assembly providing the necessary amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with the federal statutes or rules.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-19.
Overpayments.

The board has the right of setoff to recover overpayments made under this chapter and to satisfy any claims arising from embezzlement or fraud committed by a participating member, deferred member, refund beneficiary, or other person who has a claim to a distribution or any other benefit from a plan governed by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-20.
Correction of records.

The board shall correct errors in the records and actions in plans under this chapter and shall seek to recover overpayments and shall seek to collect underpayments.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 482, § 5.

54-52.6-21.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

The board shall administer the plan in compliance with the following sections of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, as they apply to governmental plans:

Section 415, including the defined contribution limitations under section 415(c)(1)(A) and (B) of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder, which are incorporated herein by reference.

In accordance with the defined contribution limitations under section 415(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, annual additions (as defined in section 415(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code) under this plan may not exceed the limitations set forth in section 415(c) (1)(A) and (B), as adjusted under section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, effective January first of each year following a regular legislative session.

If a participating member’s aggregate annual additions exceed the defined contribution limitations under section 415(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the member’s annual additions must be reduced to the extent necessary to comply with section 415(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and the Treasury Regulations thereunder.

The minimum distribution rules under section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued under that provision to the extent applicable to governmental plans. Accordingly, benefits must be distributed or begin to be distributed no later than a member’s required beginning date, and the required minimum distribution rules override any inconsistent provision of this chapter. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half before January 1, 2020, the member’s required beginning date is April first of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy and one-half or terminates employment. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half after December 31, 2019, the member’s required beginning date is April first of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy-two or terminates employment.

The annual compensation limitation under section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases under section 401(a)(17)(B).

The rollover rules under section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. Accordingly, a distributee may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution, as defined in section 402(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, paid in a direct rollover to an eligible retirement plan, as defined in section 402(c)(8)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, specified by the distributee.

If the plan of retirement benefits set forth in this chapter is terminated or discontinued, the rights of all affected participating members to accrued retirement benefits under this chapter as of the date of termination or discontinuance is nonforfeitable, to the extent then funded.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 432, § 9; 2015, ch. 259, § 15, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 439, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 15 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.